Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2521YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 277 Section 1. Section 10A.711, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. Section 10A.711, subsection 13, paragraph f, Code 3 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 4 Sec. 3. Section 135.119, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 5 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 6 Sec. 4. Section 135.131, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 7 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. âBirth centerâ means birth center as defined in section 9 10A.711 a facility or institution, which is not an ambulatory 10 surgical center or a hospital or in a hospital, in which 11 births are planned to occur following a normal, uncomplicated, 12 low-risk pregnancy . 13 Sec. 5. Section 135P.1, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 3. âHealth facilityâ means an institutional health facility 16 as defined in section 10A.711 , a birth center as defined in 17 section 135.131, a hospice licensed under chapter 135J , a 18 home health agency as defined in section 144D.1 , an assisted 19 living program certified under chapter 231C , a clinic, a 20 community health center, or the university of Iowa hospitals 21 and clinics, and includes any corporation, professional 22 corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited 23 liability partnership, or other entity comprised of such health 24 facilities. 25